District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0779.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Ballpark Bonds Loan Repayment Temporary Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. (a) Section 102a of the Ballpark Omnibus Financing and Revenue Act of 2004,
effective March 7, 2025 (D.C. Law 15-320; D.C. Official Code § 10-1601.02a), is amended by
adding a new subsection (c-1) to read as follows:
“(c-1) Notwithstanding subsections (a), (b), and (c) of this section, in Fiscal Year 2027,
pursuant to D.C. Official Code § 47-2762(d), the revenues received by the District from the
sports facilities fee imposed by D.C. Official Code § 47-2762 shall be deposited in the Fund and
shall be used as follows:
“(1) All amounts up to $49,505,000, shall be used to pay the debt service on any
ballpark early redemption borrowing and to pay debt service on the bonds for the RFK


ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
infrastructure financing and fund any reserves required under the indenture for the RFK
infrastructure financing as described in § 10-1605.31(c)(1) and (2).
“(2) The remainder shall be transferred to the General Fund of the District of
Columbia.”.
(b) Section 12(a)(2) of the Robert F. Kennedy Campus Redevelopment Amendment Act
of 2025, effective November 21, 2025 (D.C. Law 26-54; D.C. Official Code 10-1605.11(a)(2)),
is amended by striking the phrase “RFK Campus Infrastructure Fund” and inserting the phrase
“RFK Campus Infrastructure Fund and, in Fiscal Year 2027, revenue from the sports facilities
fee deposited in the Ballpark Preservation and Improvement Fund pursuant to D.C. Official Code
§ 47–2762(d)(1)” in its place.
(c) Section 2052(d)(1)(A) of the RFK Campus Infrastructure Fund Establishment Act of
2025, effective December 6, 2025 (D.C. Law 26-55; D.C. Official Code 10-1605.31(d)(1)(A)), is
amended by striking the phrase “In Fiscal Years 2026 and 2027” and inserting the phrase “In
Fiscal Year 2026” in its place.
Sec. 3. Section 47-2762(d) of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended to read
as follows:
“(d) The revenues received by the District from the sports facilities fee imposed by this
section shall be deposited into the Ballpark Revenue Fund; except, that after all principal and
interest on the bonds issued pursuant to § 10-1601.03 has been paid:


ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
“(1) In Fiscal Year 2027, the revenues shall be deposited in the Ballpark
Preservation and Improvement Fund, established pursuant to § 10–1601.02a; and
“(2) In all subsequent fiscal years, the revenues shall be deposited in the RFK
Campus Infrastructure Fund established by § 10–1605.31.”.
Sec. 4. Applicability.
This act shall apply as of October 1, 2026.
Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 6. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and a 30-day period of congressional
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having effect.